Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium
beginning July 1,  2019, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the following
purposes:
(1) Health Systems, Health
Policy and Analytics, and
Public Health ........................  $ 1,963,779,648
(2) Oregon State Hospital ........... $ 498,561,447
(3) Central services,
state assessments and
enterprise-wide costs ............ $ 185,745,227
(4) Capital improvement............. $ 753,070
(5) Debt service .......................... $ 63,938,630
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or  other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco
tax receipts, recreational marijuana  tax receipts, provider taxes, Medicare receipts and fed-
eral funds for  indirect cost recovery, Supplemental Security Income recoveries, Women, In-
fants and Children Program food rebates, the Coordinated School  Health Program, the
Edward Byrne  Memorial State and Local Law Enforcement Assistance Grant Program and
emergency preparedness and response services, but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds
not described in this section, collected or received by the Oregon Health  Authority, for the
following purposes:
(1) Health Systems, Health
Policy and Analytics, and
Public Health ........................  $ 3,529,160,428
(2) Oregon State Hospital ........... $ 69,575,722
(3) Central services,
state assessments and
enterprise-wide costs ............ $ 28,592,847
Enrolled Senate Bill 5525 (SB 5525-A) Page 1
(4) Shared administrative
services ................................. $ 170,533,100
(5) Capital improvement............. $ 753,070
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Economic  De-
velopment Fund to the Oregon Health Authority, for the following purposes:
(1) Health Systems and Health
Policy and Analytics ............. $ 16,849,691
(2) Central services,
state assessments and
enterprise-wide costs ............ $ 248,309
SECTION 4.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in  section 2 of this 2019
Act, collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for the following purposes:
(1) Health Systems, Health
Policy and Analytics, and
Public Health ........................ $12,540,159,837
(2) Oregon State Hospital ........... $ 38,929,554
(3) Central services,
state assessments and
enterprise-wide costs ............ $ 56,292,045
SECTION 5.
For the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, the following  expenditures by the
Oregon Health Authority are not limited:
(1) Expenditures from the Women, Infants and Children Program food vouchers.
(2) Expenditures for the federal funds debt service on Build America Bonds.
SECTION 6.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$2,105,398,484 is established for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit
for payment of expenses by the Public Employees’ Benefit Board from the Public Employees’
Revolving Fund for benefit plan premiums and self-insurance.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,727,512,598 is established for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit
for payment of expenses by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board from the Oregon Educators
Revolving Fund for benefit plan premiums and self-insurance.
SECTION 8. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5525 (SB 5525-A) Page 2
Passed by Senate June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5525 (SB 5525-A) Page 3